Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3214
Board; issue registration number;
maintain list; disclosure on engagement documents.

(1) The board shall issue a unique registration
number to each appraisal management company that is registered in this state.

(2) The board
shall maintain a published list of the appraisal management companies that
have registered with the board pursuant to the Nebraska Appraisal Management
Company Registration Act and have been issued a registration number pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) An appraisal management company registered
in this state shall disclose the registration number provided to it by the
board on the engagement documents presented to the appraiser.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 14.